Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 12

Bicentennial Beautification Act of 1993

54-5-1201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Bicentennial Beautification Act of 1993.”

Acts 1993, ch. 455, § 1.

Collateral References. Highways
153 et seq.

54-5-1202. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly to:

Develop a permanent roadside landscaping program within the department of transportation with emphasis on wildflower preservation and propagation;

Beautify the state's roadways and enhance the aesthetics of the state's highway system while reducing maintenance costs; and

Make the public more aware of the state's landscape diversity and improve environmental quality along the roadways.

Acts 1993, ch. 455, § 2.

54-5-1203. Wildflower program.

The department of transportation shall continue the wildflower program.

The department shall plant in each of the four (4) regions of the state not less than twenty-four (24) acres of wildflowers along the highway system and at appropriate interchanges that are heavily traveled.

For the purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “wildflowers” means plants or grasses that are native to the southeastern United States, and Tennessee in particular, when available.

The department is encouraged to take measures to reduce mowing costs associated with this program. In rural areas beyond the immediate roadside identified as having existing high quality native wildflower habitats, mowing should be conducted only as necessary to encourage the full development of the wildflower habitats. The department of environment and conservation shall assist the department of transportation in identifying these sites.

For the benefit of the traveling public and mowing crews, the areas shall carry appropriate notations stating that the wildflowers are present.

Acts 1993, ch. 455, § 3; 1995, ch. 413, §§ 1-4.

54-5-1204. Participation by community groups.

It is the intent of the general assembly to encourage business groups, civic organizations, garden clubs, and individuals to assist, on a volunteer basis, in planting and maintaining Tennessee native wildflowers, other native plants, and other plants along the highway system and at appropriate interchanges that are heavily traveled.

The commissioner of transportation may enter into formal agreements with business groups, civic organizations, garden clubs, and individuals for volunteer services to assist, on a volunteer basis, in planting and maintaining Tennessee native wildflowers, other native plants, and other plants along the highway system in accordance with plans devised by the commissioner after consultation with the volunteers.

The commissioner may direct that appropriate signs be erected to recognize and express appreciation to a provider of volunteer services.

Acts 1993, ch. 455, § 4.

54-5-1205. Rules and regulations.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to implement this part.

Acts 1993, ch. 455, § 5.

54-5-1206. Acreage in addition to acres already planted and cultivated.

The acres that are planted pursuant to this part shall be in addition to acres already planted and under cultivation. The acres planted as of July 1, 1993, shall be maintained and continued and shall be included in the required report.

Acts 1993, ch. 455, § 6.